Hawaii statutes.
§185-3 Powers and duties of the
administrator and managers. (a) The administrator shall be responsible to
the board for supervision of the organization plans and actions of the
managers.

(b) The administrator shall have the power and
duty to:

(1) Review and approve plans prepared by the
managers;

(2) Establish procedures and guidelines for the
prevention, control, and extinguishment of fires coming within the meaning of
this chapter;

(3) Establish procedures, guidelines, and conditions
for the issuance of burning permits and for determining periods when forest
reserves, public hunting areas, wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and natural
area reserves shall be closed;

(4) Close or partially close forest reserves, public
hunting areas, wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and natural area reserves, by
restricting certain activities when necessary;

(5) Summon, when necessary, additional firefighting
assistance, equipment, supplies, and materials needed to extinguish fires; and

(6) Do any act which the manager is empowered to
perform under this chapter.

(c) The manager shall have the power and duty
to:

(1) Prepare a plan for fire protection within the
meaning of section [185-1.5];

(2) Take necessary measures for the prevention,
control, and extinguishment of fires coming within the meaning of this chapter;

(3) Issue fire warning notices during dry periods or
other seasons when fire hazards are great;

(4) Close forest reserves, public hunting areas,
wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and natural area reserves to public access or
restrict their use during dry periods when necessary, to reduce fire risk;

(5) Close public access to areas in which fire
control operations are ongoing;

(6) Issue burning permits as provided in section
185-7;

(7) Receive, audit, and if correct, approve and
transmit to the department through the administrator, all reports and accounts
for expenses incurred in the prevention, control, and extinguishment of any
fires which come within the meaning of this chapter;

(8) Summon, when necessary, additional firefighting
assistance, equipment, supplies, or materials to assist in fighting a fire;

(9) Assume full responsibility for directing the
control and extinguishment of any fire coming within the meaning of this
chapter, including directing the control and extinguishment of any fire on or
threatening any lands included in section [185-1.5] as may be provided for
under mutual aid agreements with other fire control agencies; and

(10) Conduct educational work in the protection of
forest reserves, public hunting areas, wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and
natural area reserves against fires. [L 1953, c 100, §5; RL 1955, §19-53; am L
1957, c 98, §2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS §185-3; am
L 1974, c 64, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 338, §2; am L 1994, c 140,
§4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next